Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Article 3. Inspection and Certification — Apis Bees

§ 11-7-301.
Apiaries;
powers and duties of the department.

To prevent the spread of bee diseases, bee parasites or bee pests among bees and apiaries, to protect apiaries against depredation by wildlife and to assist law enforcement agencies in an effort to alleviate losses due to theft, the department may:

Order the transfer of colonies of bees from hives or containers which cannot be properly examined for brood or other bee diseases, bee parasites or bee pests to other hives or containers;

Order disinfection of any bee, beehive, brood comb or any other equipment which is infected or contaminated and burn any infected or contaminated bee, beehive, brood comb or any other equipment if, in its judgment, disinfection will not remove the infection or contamination. Before burning any property, the department shall give the owner or person in charge a written notice at least ten (10) days before the date on which the property will be burned. The notice shall be given by certified mail or personal service upon the owner or person in charge of the property;

Quarantine any apiary where foulbrood or any contagious or infectious bee diseases, bee parasites or bee pests are present and, during the quarantine, prevent the removal from the apiary of any bees or equipment except under a special permit issued by the department permitting the removal under conditions it prescribes. A person may not sell or offer for sale any apiary, bees or equipment which are under quarantine unless the department issues a permit authorizing the sale or removal. Written notice of quarantine shall be posted by the department, owner or person in charge at the quarantined apiary at a conspicuous place, and a copy shall be personally served or sent by certified mail to the owner of the apiary or person in charge. The quarantine continues in effect until it is ordered removed and a copy of the removal order served in the same manner;

Inspect any apiary, hives, equipment or premises for the presence of bee diseases, bee parasites or bee pests. Hives belonging to persons owning apiaries within the state shall be inspected for contagious diseases according to schedules established by the department. Apiary inspectors shall establish the date for the inspection of any apiary with the beekeeper. The inspection date shall be agreeable to the inspector and the beekeeper and shall include a total of seven (7) consecutive days upon which the inspection can be undertaken due to weather and unforeseen circumstances. Any beekeeper responsible for an apiary who refuses an inspection on any of the seven (7) agreed upon dates is subject to penalties provided pursuant to W.S.

11-7-133

;

Order the hives within an apiary which is not legally registered with the state to be confiscated. The owner of the apiary shall be notified at least seven (7) days prior to the date of confiscation. Notification shall be by certified mail addressed to the last known address of the owner or by personal service upon the owner;

Promulgate and enforce rules adopted to carry out the purpose of this chapter;

Enter into agreements with the game and fish commission as necessary to protect bees and hives against wild animals;

Assist any sheriff, peace officer or district attorney in any county in the discharge of their duties or investigations relating to the apiary industry.

Any owner of bees possessing more than fifty (50) colonies shall furnish one (1) helper to assist the inspector. Apiary inspectors may inspect bee colonies at any time without previous notice.

Any person failing to comply with a rule, order or provision of a quarantine pursuant to this section is subject to penalties provided in W.S.

11-7-133

.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 7, § 1; 1996, ch. 33, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2010, ch. 14, § 2.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a)(v), substituted “service upon” for “service to.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “bee diseases, bee parasites or bee pests” for “contagious and infectious disease” in introductory language of (a); substituted “bee diseases, bee parasites or bee pests” for “diseases” in (a)(i) and (a)(iii); in (a)(iv), substituted “bee diseases, bee parasites or bee pests” for “disease” in the first sentence, and added the third through fifth sentences.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 11-7-302.
Importation
of bees, combs or hives.

A beekeeper shall notify the department and request an inspection to be conducted at any specified registered location or holding yard not later than fourteen (14) days after entry of any colony into this state. Following an inspection for colony health, the department may issue an export certificate for any colony imported into Wyoming. An export certificate is valid for one (1) year and allows export from and re-entry into Wyoming at any port of entry.

Bees shipped on combless packages or in packages on new frames and new foundation are not prohibited.

Comb honey in sections intended for human consumption is not prohibited.

All package bees shipped into Wyoming shall be accompanied by an affidavit stating that no honey has been used for food in transit. It is unlawful for anyone shipping queen bees in cages into this state to use any honey for queen cage foods.

If an official Wyoming apiary inspector finds that any bees imported into the state have infectious or contagious diseases within fourteen (14) days after arrival, the apiary inspector shall destroy the diseased bees and equipment.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 7, § 1; 2001, ch. 106, § 1; 2010, ch. 14, § 2.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, rewrote (a), deleting the former first four sentences, substituting “A beekeeper shall” for “Upon entry into this state, an owner must,” and adding the last two sentences.